Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.58.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that:

(1) Washington state recognizes the importance of protecting

its citizens from unwanted wireless surveillance.

(2) Enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards are intended to facilitate efficient travel at land and sea borders between the United States, Canada, and Mexico, not to facilitate the profiling and tracking of individuals.

(3) Easy access to the information found on enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards could facilitate the commission of other unwanted offenses, such as identity theft.

[ 2008 c 200 s 1.]